Nevada, session 83, AB386.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 388.157 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.157 1. The board of trustees of each school district and
the governing body of each charter school shall prepare a plan to
improve the literacy of pupils enrolled in an elementary school.
Such a plan must include, without limitation:
(a) A program to provide intervention services and intensive
instruction to pupils who have been identified as deficient in the
subject area of reading to ensure that those pupils achieve adequate
proficiency in the requisite reading skills and reading
comprehension skills necessary to perform at a level determined by
a statewide assessment to be within a level determined by the State
Board , or an equivalent level determined by an assessment
administered by the board of trustees of a school district or
governing body of a charter school, for a pupil enrolled in the same
grade in which the pupil is enrolled. Such a program must include,
without limitation, regularly scheduled reading sessions in small
groups and specific instruction designed to target any area of
reading in which the pupil demonstrates a deficiency, including,
without limitation, phonological and phonemic awareness, decoding
skills, reading fluency and vocabulary and reading comprehension
strategies;
(b) Procedures for assessing a pupil’s proficiency in the subject
area of reading using valid and reliable standards-based assessments
[that have been approved by the State Board by regulation] during
each grade level of the elementary school at which the pupil is
enrolled as determined necessary;
(c) A program to improve the proficiency in reading of pupils
who are English learners; and
(d) Procedures for facilitating collaboration between licensed
teachers designated as literacy specialists and classroom teachers.
2. The board of trustees of each school district or the governing
body of a charter school, as applicable, shall:
-
*AB386_R3*

– 3 –
(a) Submit its plan to the Department for approval on or before
the date prescribed by the Department on a form prescribed by the
Department; and
(b) Make such revisions to the plan as the Department
determines are necessary.
3. The Department [shall] :
(a) Shall adopt regulations that prescribe procedures for
assessing the development across early learning domains of a pupil
enrolled in kindergarten within the first 45 days of school in a
school year.
(b) May adopt regulations prescribing the manner by which
the board of trustees of each school district and the governing
body of a charter school are required to collect and report the
results of any assessment used by the school district or charter
school, as applicable, to assess a pupil’s proficiency in the subject
area of reading.
(c) May prescribe one or more valid and reliable standards-
based statewide assessments that must be used in a school district
or charter school to assess a pupil’s proficiency in the subject area
of reading if the board of trustees of the school district or the
governing body of the charter school, as applicable, fails to
include such an assessment in the plan submitted pursuant to
subsection 1.
4. If the board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school administers an assessment to assess the
proficiency of a pupil in the subject of reading other than a
statewide assessment prescribed pursuant to paragraph (c) of
subsection 3 and the Department has established a method to
determine an equivalent score to a score on a statewide assessment
for such an assessment, the Department shall award a grant to the
school district or local educational agency for the charter school
in an amount equal to the savings to the Department, on a
proportional basis, for not administering the statewide assessment
to pupils in the school district or charter school, as applicable. A
grant to a school district or local educational agency awarded
pursuant to this subsection must not exceed, on a per pupil basis,
the cost of a statewide assessment prescribed pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 3.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
H
-
*AB386_R3*